Alabama, session 2026rs, SB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 9-17-111 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§9-17-111
(a) No permittee operating a bulk facility for the
purpose of filling liquefied petroleum gas cylinders for
distribution for subsequent retail sale may fill or store
Page 1

distribution for subsequent retail sale may fill or store
SB2 INTRODUCED
filled liquefied petroleum gas cylinders within 3,000 feet of
the boundary line of adjoining real property upon which a
school, church, hospital, athletic field, or other place of
public gathering is located.
(b) This section shall not be construed to apply to a
retail facility where filled liquefied petroleum gas cylinders
are stored for retail sale, including as part of a liquefied
petroleum gas exchange program.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2